Utah statutes.
75-7-303.   Representation by fiduciaries and parents.
To the extent there is no conflict of interest between the representative and
the person represented or among those being represented with respect to a
particular question or dispute:
(1)  a conservator may represent and bind the protected person whose estate
the conservator controls;
(2)  a guardian may represent and bind the ward if a conservator of the ward's
estate has not been appointed;
(3)  an agent having authority to act with respect to the particular question
or dispute may represent and bind the principal;
(4)  a trustee may represent and bind the beneficiaries of the trust;
(5)  a personal representative of a decedent's estate may represent and bind
persons interested in the estate; and
(6)  a parent may represent and bind the parent's minor or unborn child if a
conservator or guardian for the child has not been appointed.
